Hawaii statutes.
[§11-352] False name contributions
prohibited. (a) No person shall make a contribution to any candidate, candidate
committee, or noncandidate committee in any name other than that of the person
who owns the money, property, or service.

(b) All contributions made in the name of a
person other than the owner of the money, property, or service shall escheat to
the Hawaii election campaign fund. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next